Hawaii statutes.
§490:2-310 Open time for payment or
running of credit; authority to ship under reservation. Unless otherwise
agreed:

(a) Payment is due at the time and place at which the
buyer is to receive the goods even though the place of shipment is the place of
delivery;

(b) If the seller is authorized to send the goods the
seller may ship them under reservation, and may tender the documents of title,
but the buyer may inspect the goods after their arrival before payment is due
unless such inspection is inconsistent with the terms of the contract (section
490:2-513);

(c) If delivery is authorized and made by way of
documents of title otherwise than by [paragraph] (b), then payment is due
regardless of where the goods are to be received:

[(i)] At the time and place at which the buyer
is to receive delivery of the tangible documents; or

[(ii)] At the time the buyer is to receive
delivery of the electronic documents and at the seller's place of business or
if none, the seller's residence; and

(d) Where the seller is required or authorized to
ship the goods on credit, the credit period runs from the time of shipment but
postdating the invoice or delaying its dispatch will correspondingly delay the
starting of the credit period. [L 1965, c 208, §2-310; HRS §490:2-310; am L
2004, c 163, §6; gen ch 2004]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next